Hawaii statutes.
§841-1 Who are coroners. The chief of
police or his authorized subordinate of the counties of Hawaii, Maui, and
Kauai, and the medical examiner of the city and county of Honolulu, shall, ex
officio, be the coroner for his respective county. [L 1935, c 90, §1; am L
1939, c 104, §7; am L 1943, c 62, §21 and c 64, §22; RL 1945, §10901; RL 1955,
§260-1; HRS §715-1; ren L 1972, c 9, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next